Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.003

Commission—Meetings—Chairperson—Compensation and travel expenses.

Members of the commission shall meet at such places and times as it shall determine and as often as necessary to discharge the duties imposed upon it. The commission shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its members. A majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. The commission is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. Each member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2022 c 240 s 14; 2013 c 19 s 4; 1984 c 287 s 43; 1979 c 90 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 40; 1963 c 38 s 17; 1935 c 98 s 2; RRS s 10132-1. Formerly RCW 43.69.020.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.